Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.2 Medical Assistance Fraud
40-8.2-21.
Suspension of payments to a provider.

The executive office of health and human services may issue a suspension of payments order if:

The provider does not meet certification requirements of the Rhode Island Medicaid program; or

The Rhode Island Medicaid program has been unable to collect (or make satisfactory arrangements for the collection of) amounts due on account of overpayments to any provider; or

The office of program integrity and/or the Medicaid fraud control unit of the attorney general’s office has been unable to obtain, from a provider, the data and information necessary to enable it to determine the existence or amount (if any) of the overpayments made to a provider; or

The office of program integrity or the Medicaid fraud control unit of the attorney general’s office has been denied reasonable access to information by a provider that pertains to a patient or resident of a long-term residential-care facility or to a former patient or resident of a long-term residential-care facility; or

The office of program integrity and/or the Medicaid fraud control unit of the attorney general’s office has been denied reasonable access to data and information by the provider for the purpose of conducting activities as described in § 1903(g) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(g); or

The office of program integrity has been presented with reliable evidence that the provider has engaged in fraud or willful misrepresentation under the Medicaid program.

Any such order of the executive office of health and human services may cease to be effective at such time as the office of program integrity is satisfied that the provider is participating in substantial negotiations that seek to remedy the conditions that gave rise to its order of suspension of payments, or that amounts are no longer due from the provider or that a satisfactory arrangement has been made for the payment of the provider or that a satisfactory arrangement has been made for the payment by the provider of any such amounts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-22.
Interest on overcharges.

Any provider of services or goods contracting with the executive office of health and human services, pursuant to Title XIX or Title XXI of the Social Security Act, who, without intent to defraud, obtains payments under this chapter in excess of the amount to which the provider is entitled, thereby becomes liable for payment of the amount of the excess with payment of interest allowable by law, under §

6-26-2

, as was in effect on the date payment was made to the provider. The interest period will commence on the date upon which payment was made and will extend to the date upon which repayment is made to the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 12.

40-8.2-23.
Use of Medicaid funds for anti-union purposes prohibited.

Medicaid reimbursement for costs incurred directly related to influencing employees regarding their right to organize, to form a union, or to join a union, shall not be considered to be allowable, whether performed directly by the provider or through contracts with consultants or attorneys.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 358, § 1.